North Carolina statutes. Chapter 1E. Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians.
Article 1. Full Faith and Credit.

§ 1E-1.
Full faith and credit.

The courts of this State shall give full faith and credit to a judgment, decree, or order signed by a judicial officer of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians and filed in the Cherokee Tribal Courts to the same extent as is given a judgment, decree, or order of another state, subject to the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section; provided that the judgments, decrees, and orders of the courts of this State are given full faith and credit by the Tribal Courts of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians.

Judgments, decrees, and orders specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be given full faith and credit subject to the provisions of

G.S. 1C-1705

and

G.S. 1C-1708

and shall be considered a foreign judgment for purposes of these statutes.

Any limited driving privilege signed and issued by a Judge or Justice of the Cherokee Tribal Courts in accordance with the applicable provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes and filed in the Cherokee Tribal Courts Clerk’s Office shall be valid and given full faith and credit as specified in subsection (a) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, any reference to the issuing “judge” or “court” in the applicable provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes shall be construed to mean the appropriate Judge or Justice in the Cherokee Tribal Courts or the appropriate Cherokee Tribal Court.

History.

2001-456, s. 1; 2015-287, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-287, s. 1, effective October 23, 2015, substituted “courts” for “court” two times in subsection (a); substituted “subsections (b) and (c)” for “subsection (b)” in subsection (a); substituted “G.S. 1C-1705 and

G.S. 1C-1708

” for “G.S. 1C-1705,

G.S. 1C-1708

, G.S. 1C-1804, and G.S. 1C-1805” in subsection (b); and added subsection (c).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Representation for Removal? The Cherokee’s Claim to a Congressional Delegate Assessed Under the Canons of Construction,” see 99 N. C.L. Rev. 223 (2020).

§ 1E-2.
County services.

A county is not compelled to provide services on lands held in trust by the United States for the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians, except for public health or human services traditionally provided by county agencies and not otherwise assumed by the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians, unless there is an agreement between the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians and the county describing each party’s responsibilities. The agreement must be approved and signed by the Principal Chief of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians on behalf of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians and must be signed by the county manager or delegated department head. The agreement may be effective for a definite period of time or an indefinite period of time, as specified in the agreement.

History.

2015-262, s. 1(b); 2016-123, s. 2.4(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2015-262, s. 2, provides: “The Department of Revenue may enter into an agreement with the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians in regards to the excise tax on tobacco products administered under Article 2A of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes. The agreement must be approved by the Tribal Council of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians and signed by the Principal Chief of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians on behalf of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians and must be signed by the Secretary of Revenue on behalf of the Department of Revenue. The agreement may be effective for a definite period of time or an indefinite period, as specified in the agreement.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-123, s. 2.4(a), effective August 1, 2016, in the first sentence, inserted “except for public health or human services traditionally provided by county agencies and not otherwise assumed by the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians” and deleted “and any compensation for services provided” at the end, deleted “by the Tribal Council of the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians” following “The agreement must be approved” and substituted “county manager or delegated department head” for “chair of the board of county commissioners on behalf of the county” at the end of the second sentence.

§§ 1E-3 through 1E-9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.